tr: Motor konumu: Çift göbek (AWD); Ön göbek; Ortadan tahrikli; Arka göbek; Diğer
sk-SK: Poloha motora: Dvojitý náboj (AWD); Predný náboj; Stredový pohon; Zadný náboj; Iné
pt-PT: Posição do motor: Cubo duplo (tração integral); Cubo dianteiro; Central; Cubo traseiro; Outro
el: Θέση κινητήρα: Διπλή πλήμνη (AWD); Μπροστινή πλήμνη; Κεντρική (Mid-drive); Πίσω πλήμνη; Άλλο
da: Motorplacering: Dobbelt nav (AWD); Forreste nav; Centermotor; Bageste nav; Andet
de: Motorposition: Dual-Nabe (Allrad); Vorderradnabe; Mittelmotor; Hinterradnabe; Sonstige
it: Posizione del motore: Mozzo doppio (AWD); Mozzo anteriore; Motore centrale; Mozzo posteriore; Altro
zh-CN: 电机位置: 双轮毂（AWD）; 前轮毂; 中置驱动; 后轮毂; 其他
sl-SI: Položaj motorja: Dvojno pesto (AWD); Sprednje pesto; Sredinski pogon; Zadnje pesto; Drugo
zh-TW: 馬達位置: 雙輪轂 (AWD); 前輪轂; 中置驅動; 後輪轂; 其他
hr-HR: Položaj motora: Dvostruka glavčina (AWD); Prednja glavčina; Srednji pogon; Stražnja glavčina; Ostalo
fi: Moottorin sijainti: Kaksoisnapa (AWD); Etunapa; Keskimoottori; Takanapa; Muu
ro-RO: Poziția motorului: Butuc dublu (AWD); Butuc față; Montat central; Butuc spate; Altele
th: ตำแหน่งมอเตอร์: ดุมล้อคู่ (AWD); ดุมล้อหน้า; มอเตอร์กลาง; ดุมล้อหลัง; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Позиция на мотора: Двойна главина (AWD); Предна главина; Централно задвижване; Задна главина; Друго
fr: Position du moteur: Double moyeu (AWD); Moyeu avant; Moteur central; Moyeu arrière; Autre
nl: Motor positie: Dubbele naaf (AWD); Voornaaf; Middenmotor; Achternaaf; Overig
nb: Motorposisjon: Dobbelt nav (AWD); Fremre nav; Midtmontert; Bakre nav; Annet
es: Posición del motor: Cubo dual (AWD); Cubo delantero; Motor central; Cubo trasero; Otro
hu: Motor elhelyezkedése: Kettős agy (AWD); Első agy; Középmotor; Hátsó agy; Egyéb
ru: Расположение двигателя: Два мотор-колеса (полный привод); Переднее мотор-колесо; Центральный; Заднее мотор-колесо; Другое
cs: Poloha motoru: Dva náboje (AWD); Přední náboj; Středový pohon; Zadní náboj; Jiné
sv: Motorposition: Dubbla nav (AWD); Framnav; Mittmonterad; Baknav; Annan
pl: Pozycja silnika: Dwie piasty (AWD); Przednia piasta; Napęd centralny; Tylna piasta; Inna
ko: 모터 위치: 듀얼 허브(AWD); 프론트 허브; 미드 드라이브; 리어 허브; 기타
lt-LT: Variklio padėtis: Dviejų ratų stebulėse (visų varančiųjų ratų); Priekinėje stebulėje; Viduryje; Galinėje stebulėje; Kita
vi: Vị trí động cơ: Hai đùm (AWD); Đùm trước; Đặt giữa; Đùm sau; Khác
en: Motor position: Dual hub (AWD); Front hub; Mid-drive; Rear hub; Other
pt-BR: Motor posição: Cubo duplo (AWD); Cubo dianteiro; Motor central; Cubo traseiro; Outra
ja: 運動位置: デュアルハブ (AWD); フロントハブ; ミッドドライブ; リアハブ; その他